Utah statutes.
63M-11-205.   Appointment of chair -- Meetings.

(1)  The governor shall appoint a member of the commission to serve as chair.

(2) (a)  Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (2), the chair is responsible for the call and conduct of meetings.

(b)  The chair shall call and hold meetings of the commission at least bimonthly.

(c)  One of the bimonthly meetings described in Subsection (2)(b) shall be held while the Legislature is convened in its annual session.

(d)  One or more additional meetings may be called upon request by a majority of the commission's members.

(3) (a)  A majority of the members of the commission constitute a quorum.

(b)  The action of a majority of a quorum constitutes the action of the commission.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

